DI-60 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

NOTICE:
When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.
HINT:
e UsingSST09843 -18020,connecttheterminalsTcandE 1,and remove the short pin.
. Ifany abnormality is notfound wheninspecting parts, inspectthe ECU.
. Ifamalfunction codeis displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code. For de-
tails of each code, turn to the page referred to under the "See page” for respective "DTC No.” in the

DIC3V-01

DTC chart.
DTC No. )
Detection Item Trouble Area
(See Page)
C0278/ 11 on Hortin ABS Solenoidralay circuit * ABS salenqidrelawy
0 penorshortin solenoidretay cireut * ABS solenoid relay circuit
C0279/ 12 . . o * ABS solenoidrelay
B+ short in ABS solenoid relay circuit ) o
0 * ABS solenoid relay circuit
C0226/2 1 Open orshortin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit (SFR ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
0 circuit) * SFRR or SFRH circuit
C0236/22 Open orshortin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit (SFL « Hydraulic brake booster
0 circuit) * SFLR or SFLH circuit
C0246/23 Openor shortin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit (SRR * Hydraulic brake booster
0 circuit) *SRHor SRRcircuit
C1225/25 Openor shortin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit (SA 1 eHydraulicbrake booster
0 circuit) * SA1 circuit
C1226/26 Open orshortin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit (SA2  Hydraulic brake booster
0 circuit) * SA2circuit
* Right front spee~c sensor
C0200/31% | . o o 9 ¢ S
(DI-79) Rightfrontwheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Speed sensor circuit
« Sensor rotor
1 * Leftfrontspeed sensor
C0205/32* . . P -
(DI-65) Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction » Speed sensor circuit
« Sensor rotor
1 * Rightrear speed sensor
C0210/33* . . . 9 P -
(DI-65) Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Speed sensor circuit
» Sensorrotor
1 * Leftrear speedsensor
C0215/34* . . P Lo
(DI-65) Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Speed sensor circuit
» Sensorrotor
C1237/37 o . ) o
B Some tire is different size from the other tires e Tiresize
 Batter
C1241 / 41 o L attery
. Low battery voltage or opencircuitin IG 1 circuit *|Cregulator
* Power source circuit
* Batt
C1242/42 N - e
. Open circuit in G2 circuit «ICregulator
* Power source circuit
C1243/43 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output) ] .
0 * Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1244/44 o . o ¢ Deceleration sensor
Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit ) -
O * Deceleration sensor circuit
C1245/45 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor . .
0 *Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
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C1248 /48 | +Open or short circuit in rear differential lock circuit . .
. - . * Rear differential lock
0 * Rear differential is locking
C1249/ 49 A . . - . . .
. Open circuit in stop light switch circuit « Stop light switch circuit

2
C1251/51*

* Pump motor is locked

* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

0 ¢ Open circuit in pump motor ground
C1252) 52*2 * Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
- Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction * Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
* Pressure switch (PH or PL)
2
C1253/53* . . * ABS motor relay
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction o
0 « ABS motor relay circuit
2
C1254 | 54* . . * Pressure switch (PH or PL)
Pressure switch malfunction . o
0 * Pressure switch circuit
C1256 56*2 * Accumulator
. Accumulator low pressure malfunction ¢ Pressure switch (PH or PL)
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
C1257 /57 " Battery
. Power supply drive circuit malfunction * Power Source circuit
«ABS ECU
* Battery
Always ON «|Cregulator
y Malfunction in ABS ECU 9 .
0 * Power source circuit

*ABSECU

*': Asthe DTC cannotbe erased by replacing parts alone do either of the following operations.

(1)

(2) Atavehicle speed of 20 km/h (

Clear the DTC (See page DI-54).

* :Usingthefollowing table, troubled parts can be specified.

12mph), drive the vehicle for 30 seconds or more.

1: Referto LAND CRUISER Repair Manual Pub. No. RM6 16E
DTC 42 51 52 53 54 56 57
BRAKE warning light and buzzer Light | Buzzer| Light | Buzzer| Light |Buzzer| Light | Buzzer| Light | Buzzer| Light | Buzzer| Light |Buzzer
O O O U U
Pressure switch PH
PL O O O 0J O
Pump motor ujojpujo U |d
Pump motor circuit MTT wire harness Sl
MT+ wire harness
MT- wire harness
Accumulator malfunction 0|0
MR1 open circuit -
o MR2 open circuit U
Motor relay circuit 0
MR1 welded contact]
MR2 welded contact -
Hydraulic brake booster|pressure leaks o (o oo
Power souse* |G2 open circuit U
ECU Power supply circuit .

*: When IG1 circuit is open, the ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come

on.
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